Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-267
Transmission services; acceptance of charges required.

No common carrier shall provide transmission services for pay-per-call services originated by an information provider and charged to the consumer unless the called party has taken affirmative action clearly indicating that it accepts the charges for the collect pay-per-call service. This restriction includes eight hundred number call-back service.

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1108;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 129.